District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0057.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Motor Vehicle Insurance Modernization Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. The Compulsory/No-Fault Motor Vehicle Insurance Act of 1982, effective
September 18, 1982 (D.C. Law 4-155; D.C. Official Code § 31-2401 et seq.), is amended as
follows:
(a) Section 7 (D.C. Code § 31-2406) is amended as follows:
(1) Subsection (a)(1)(D) is amended by striking the phrase “and (iii) uninsured
motorist protection. In addition, each insurer shall offer optional personal injury protection
insurance required by section 5 and underinsured motor vehicle coverage as required by this
section” and inserting the phrase “(iii) enhanced private passenger underinsured motorist
protection or underinsured private passenger motorist protection; and (iv) uninsured private
passenger motorist protection. In addition, each insurer shall offer optional personal injury
protection insurance required by section 5” in its place.
(2) Subsection (b) is amended by striking the phrase “$10,000 for property
damage in any 1 accident” and inserting the phrase “$20,000 for property damage in any one
accident” in its place.
(3) Subsection (c) is amended by striking the phrase “be $25,000 per person
injured in any 1 accident and $50,000 for all persons injured in any 1 accident” and inserting the
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
phrase “be $50,000 per person injured in any one accident and $100,000 for all persons injured
in any one accident” in its place.
(4) Subsection (c-1) is amended as follows:
(A) Strike the phrase “, except for the operation of motorcycles and motor-
driven cycles, optional underinsured motor” and insert the phrase “underinsured motor” in its
place.
(B) Strike the phrase “. The insurer shall not be required to obtain or
maintain written rejections of the underinsured motor vehicle coverage.” and insert a period in its
place.
(C) Strike the phrase “Insurance that includes underinsured motor vehicle
coverage may include terms and conditions that preclude stacking of underinsured motor vehicle
coverage.” and insert the phrase “Insurance that includes only underinsured motor vehicle
coverage, and not enhanced underinsured motor vehicle coverage, may include terms and
conditions that preclude stacking of underinsured motor vehicle coverage.” in its place.
(5) Subsection (f) is amended as follows:
(A) Paragraph (2) is amended by striking the phrase “amounts of $25,000
per person injured in any 1 accident, or $50,000 for all persons injured in any 1 accident, and
coverage for property damage in an amount of $5,000 for property damage in any 1 accident”
and inserting the phrase “amounts of $50,000 per person injured in any one accident, or
$100,000 for all persons injured in any one accident, and coverage for property damage in an
amount of $20,000 for property damage in any one accident” in its place.
(B) Paragraph (4) is amended by striking the phrase “in any 1 accident”
both times it appears and inserting the phrase “in any one accident” in its place.
(6) A new subsection (f-1) is added to read as follows:
“(f-1) Enhanced underinsured motorist protection. —
“(1) Enhanced underinsured motorist protection is for the protection of an insured
who is legally entitled to recover damages from the owner or operator of an underinsured motor
vehicle.
“(2)(A) The limit of liability for an insurer that provides enhanced underinsured
motor vehicle coverage is the amount of that coverage without any reduction for the amount paid
to the insured, that exhausts any applicable liability insurance policies, bonds, and securities on
behalf of any person that may be held liable for the bodily injuries or death of the insured.
“(B) A policy providing excess coverage may include enhanced
underinsured motor vehicle coverage, in an amount equal to but not greater than the excess
coverage in the policy. A policy that, as its primary purpose, provides coverage in excess of
other valid and collectible insurance or qualified self-insurance may include the enhanced
underinsured motor vehicle coverage.
“(C) An insured may not have enhanced underinsured motorist protection
and underinsured motorist protection coverage simultaneously.
2

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(D) An insured may waive enhanced underinsured motorist protection
coverage individually or collectively.
“(3)(A) Unless waived in accordance with this subsection, each insurer selling
motor vehicle insurance in the District with respect to any motor vehicle registered or principally
garaged in the District shall include coverage for enhanced underinsured motor vehicle
insurance.
“(B) The amount of enhanced underinsured motorist coverage provided
under a private passenger motor vehicle liability insurance policy shall not exceed the amount of
uninsured motorist coverage provided under the policy.
“(C) Such policy shall contain coverage for damages, subject to the policy
limits, that:
“(i) The insured is entitled to recover from the owner or operator of
an underinsured motor vehicle because of bodily injuries sustained in a motor vehicle accident
arising out of the ownership, maintenance, or use of the underinsured motor vehicle; and
“(ii) A survivor of the insured is entitled to recover from the owner
or operator of an underinsured motor vehicle because the insured died as the result of a motor
vehicle accident arising out of the ownership, maintenance, or use of the underinsured motor
vehicle.
“(D) An insurer may exclude from the enhanced underinsured motor
vehicle coverage benefits:
“(i) The named insured or a family member of the named insured
who resides in the named insured’s household for an injury that occurs when the named insured
or family member is occupying or is struck as a pedestrian by an underinsured motor vehicle that
is owned by the named insured or an immediate family member of the named insured who
resides in the named insured’s household; and
“(ii) The named insured, a family member of the named insured
who resides in the named insured’s household, and any other individual who has other applicable
motor vehicle insurance for an injury that occurs when the named insured, family member, or
other individual is occupying or is stuck as a pedestrian by the insured motor vehicle while the
motor vehicle is operated or used by an individual who is excluded from coverage under District
law.
“(4)(A) If the first named insured does not wish to obtain the enhanced
underinsured motorist coverage under this section, the first named insured shall make an
affirmative written statement waiving the coverage, as provided by this paragraph.
“(B) A waiver made under this subsection shall not be effective unless
waiver is made after the insurer provides the first named insured written notice of the nature,
extent, benefit, and cost of the level of the enhanced underinsured motorist coverage being
waived.
“(C) A waiver made under this subsection shall be made on a form that the
Commissioner requires. The form:
3

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(i) May be part of the insurance contract;
“(ii) Shall clearly explain that if the first named insured chooses to
waive enhanced underinsured motorist coverage, the first named insured shall have the option to
select traditional underinsured motorist coverage or no underinsured motorist coverage; and
“(iii) Shall clearly and concisely explain in at least 12-point
boldface type:
“(I) The nature, extent, benefit, and cost of the level of the
enhanced underinsured motorist coverage that would be provided under the policy if not waived
by the first named insured;
“(II) That a failure of the first named insured to make a
waiver requires the insurer to provide enhanced underinsured motorist coverage;
“(III) That the insurer may not refuse to underwrite a
person because the person refuses to waive the enhanced underinsured motorist coverage under
this subsection; and
“(IV) That a waiver made under this subsection must be an
affirmative written waiver.
“(D) Electronic communication satisfying the requirements of this
subsection shall be an acceptable form of written waiver.
“(5) If the first named insured does not make an affirmative written statement
waiving the enhanced underinsured motorist coverage, the insurer shall provide the coverage
under this section.
“(6) Unless the first named insured affirmatively makes a change in writing, the
election not to waive enhanced underinsured motorist coverage applies to all subsequent
renewals of coverage and to all other policies or endorsements that extend, change, supersede, or
replace an existing private passenger motor vehicle insurance policy issued to the first named
insured. At the first, and each subsequent, insurance renewal following the applicability date of
the Motor Vehicle Insurance Modernization Amendment Act of 2026, passed on 2nd reading on
June 2, 2026 (Enrolled version of Bill 26-57), an insurer shall include on the form required
pursuant to paragraph (4) of this subsection:
“(A) Applicable waiver options for an insured who does not choose to
maintain enhanced underinsured motorist coverage; and
“(B) The option to add or reinstate enhanced underinsured motorist or
traditional underinsured motorist coverage for an insured who has previously waived it.
“(7) A provision in a passenger motor vehicle liability insurance policy issued on
or after the applicability date of the Motor Vehicle Insurance Modernization Amendment Act of
2026, passed on 2nd reading on June 2, 2026 (Enrolled version of Bill 26-57), about coverage for
damages sustained by the insured as a result of the operation of an underinsured motor vehicle
that requires a dispute between the insured and the insurer to be submitted to binding arbitration
is prohibited.
4

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(8) Subsection (f)(5) and (6) of this section shall apply to persons who are
insurers and the insured under this subsection.”.
(7) New subsections (i), (j), and (k) are added to read as follows:
“(i)(1) Beginning on January 1, 2037, and on January 1st of every 10 years after January
1, 2037, the amounts provided in subsections (c) and (f) of this section shall increase as follows:
“(A) The amount per person injured in any one accident shall increase by
$5,000;
“(B) The amount for all persons injured in any one accident shall increase
by $10,000; and
“(C) The amount of coverage for property damage in any one accident
shall increase by $2,000.
“(2) The amounts described in subparagraphs (A), (B), and (C) of paragraph (1)
shall apply to causes of action arising between January 1st on the year of the increase and
December 31st of the year prior to the next increase.
“(j) The Commissioner shall publish notice of any increase under subsection (i) of this
section on the Department’s website and in the District of Columbia Register at least 12 months
prior to the effective date of any such increase.
“(k) Study. —
“(1) The Commissioner shall conduct a study on the impact to consumers of the
provisions of the Motor Vehicle Insurance Modernization Amendment Act of 2026, passed on
2nd reading on June 2, 2026 (Enrolled version of Bill 26-57).
“(2) The study shall include:
“(A) An analysis of the impact on premiums of the increase of financial
responsibility limits from $25,000, $50,000, and $10,000 to $50,000, $100,000, and $20,000,
respectively, and from the offering of enhanced underinsured motorist coverage as a default
selection for coverage;
“(B) To the extent information is available, an analysis of the impact of
the increase in financial responsibility limits and the offering of enhanced underinsured motorist
coverage as a default option on compensation for damages resulting from motor vehicle
accidents, including the impact on out-of-pocket costs incurred by insureds for damages
exceeding policy limits;
“(C) To the extent information is available, an analysis of the impact on
the District’s uninsured motorist population from the increase in financial responsibility limits
from $25,000, $50,000, and $10,000 to $50,000, $100,000, and $20,000, respectively, and from
the offering of enhanced underinsured motorist coverage as a default selection for coverage; and
“(D) Any other relevant matter relating to the increase in minimum
financial responsibility limits and the offering of enhanced underinsured motorist coverage by
private passenger motor vehicle liability insurers.
5

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(3)(A) On or before December 31, 2030, the Commissioner shall submit an
interim report to the Council that includes initial findings and recommendations from the study
required under this subsection.
“(B) On or before December 31, 2032, the Commissioner shall submit a
final report to the Council that includes the findings and recommendations from the study
required under this subsection. The final report shall include a recommendation on Council
action with respect to subsections (i) and (j) of this section.”.
(b) Section 12 (D.C. Official Code § 31-2411), is amended by adding a new subsection
(e-1) to read as follows:
“(e-1) Priority of coverage for rented motor vehicles. —
“(1) For a motor vehicle rented pursuant to a written rental agreement, any valid
and collectible motor vehicle liability insurance, self-insurance, or other financial responsibility
coverage available to the renter or authorized driver shall be primary for claims arising out of the
use, operation, or possession of the rented motor vehicle during the rental period.
“(2) Any motor vehicle liability insurance, self-insurance, or other financial
responsibility coverage maintained by the rental company or its affiliate shall be secondary or
excess to the coverage described in paragraph (1) of this subsection, unless the rental company
expressly agrees in writing to provide primary coverage.
“(3) Nothing in this subsection relieves a rental company from maintaining
insurance, self-insurance, or proof of financial responsibility required by District law.
“(4) Nothing in this subsection limits liability arising from the rental company’s
own negligence, criminal wrongdoing, negligent entrustment, failure to maintain required
insurance, or other independent act or omission.
“(5) This subsection shall be construed consistently with 49 U.S.C. § 30106.”.
Sec. 3. Applicability.
This act shall apply as of October 1, 2027.
Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 5. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of Congressional review
6

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
7